Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 4 Permanent School Fund
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-4-1.
Custody and investment of fund.

The general treasurer with the advice of the governor shall have full power to regulate the custody and safekeeping of the permanent fund for the support of public schools, and, subject to the provisions of chapter 10 of title 35, shall keep the fund securely invested in bonds or notes of the United States, or in bonds of towns or cities within this state, or certificates of deposit, or commercial paper, or in other investments authorized by virtue of §

35-10-6

; provided, that the securities in which the fund is invested may remain a part of the fund until exchanged for other securities.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 30, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 40, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 41, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 194, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-4-1

; P.L. 1979, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 12, § 2.

Legislative Intent.

Section 1 of P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 12 contains legislative findings concerning the necessity for the amendments of §§

16-4-1

and

16-4-5

, repeal of §

16-4-4

, and enactment of §

16-4-6

by that Act.

16-4-2.
Duties paid by auctioneers.

The money that shall be paid into the state treasury by auctioneers, for duties accruing to the use of the state, is appropriated, and the money shall annually be added to the school fund.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 30, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 40, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 41, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 194, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

16-4-2

.

16-4-3.
State funds forfeited by cities or towns.

Whenever any money appropriated to any city or town from the state treasury, for the support of its public schools shall have been forfeited by the city or town, the money shall be added to the school fund, and shall forever remain a part of the school fund.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 30, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 40, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 41, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 194, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-4-3

.

16-4-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 30, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 40, § 4; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 41, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 194, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

16-4-4

; Repealed by P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 12, § 3, effective June 24, 1986.

16-4-5.
Use of fund and income — Unexpended funds.

The income from the fund is appropriated to be used for the promotion and support of public education. The board of regents for elementary and secondary education may adopt rules and regulations for the expenditure of these funds. In expending the income the board shall first consider public school improvement projects and programs whose effects could benefit the public schools of any one or more city, town, or school district in the state. The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall regularly make recommendations to the board about specific programs and projects to be supported by these funds and the general assembly may make appropriations from the fund principal for educational purposes. Whenever any funds are appropriated for educational purposes, the funds shall be used for educational purposes only and all these state funds must be used to supplement any and all money allocated by a city or town for educational purposes and, in no event, shall state funds be used to supplant, directly or indirectly, any money allocated by a city or town for educational purposes. The commissioner shall oversee the fund, assess the effectiveness of its programs and projects, and make recommendations about the general use and operation of the funds to the board. For the purposes of this section the general treasurer shall continue to hold, subject to expenditure by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education, any part of the income of the fund unexpended.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 30, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 40, § 5; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 41, § 5; P.L. 1925, ch. 611, § 1; P.L. 1929, ch. 1342, § 1; P.L. 1932, ch. 1920, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 194, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-4-5

; P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 12, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 77, § 8.

16-4-6.
Additions to the fund.

The general assembly shall review the adequacy of the permanent school fund on a regular basis and may make any appropriations to carry out the purposes of this chapter as it deems necessary. In addition, the board of regents for elementary and secondary education is authorized to accept grants and bequests from public and private sources in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the funds necessary to carry out the provisions of this section shall be provided within the annual appropriations act.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 12, § 4; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 73.